Alaska, session 34, HB20.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 21.36 is amended by adding a new section to article 5 to read: 05 Sec. 21.36.530. Fee for paper documents. (a) An insurer may not charge an 06 additional fee or impose a different rate for providing a paper statement, invoice, 07 notice, or other document. 08 (b) This section does not prohibit an insurer from charging a fee for providing 09 a duplicate copy of a paper statement, invoice, notice, or other document that has 10 already been provided. 11 (c) The director may adopt regulations to implement, define, and enforce this 12 section. 13 * Sec. 2. AS 45.45 is amended by adding a new section to article 13 to read: 14 Sec. 45.45.940. Fee for paper documents. (a) A business may not charge an 01 additional fee or impose a different rate for providing a paper statement, invoice, 02 notice, or other document. 03 (b) This section does not prohibit a business from charging a fee for providing 04 a duplicate copy of a paper statement, invoice, notice, or other document that has 05 already been provided. 06 (c) In this section, "business" has the meaning given in AS 43.70.110. 07 * Sec. 3. AS 45.50.471(b) is amended by adding a new paragraph to read: 08 (58) violating AS 45.45.940 (paper document fees). 09 * Sec. 4. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.